District of Columbia statutes.
34-917

Utility may make complaint.

Any public utility may make complaint as to any matter affecting its own product or service with like effect as though made by the Commission or upon reasonable complaint as hereinbefore provided.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 984, ch. 150, § 8, par. 47
1973 Ed., § 43-417.
1981 Ed., § 43-618.
This section is referenced in § 34-1552.